Utah statutes.
59-2-1316.   Annual settlements between county assessor, county treasurer, and county auditor.

Every county assessor and county treasurer shall annually, on the first Monday in January, make a settlement with the county auditor of all transactions connected with the revenue for the previous year, and every county treasurer, on the expiration of the treasurer's term of office, shall make the settlement.

